Missouri, session 2026, SB1280.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 182.825 and 182.827, RSMo, are
repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 182.825, 182.826, and 182.827, to read as
follows:
182.825. As used in sections 182.825, 182.826, and
182.827, the following terms mean:
(1) "Digital library catalog", an electronic database,
application, or website that lists or provides resources or
materials, including, but not limited to, books, electronic
books, periodicals, and multimedia content, including, but
not limited to, images, audio, and videos;
(2) "Explicit sexual material", as that term is
defined in section 573.010;
(3) "Pornographic for minors", as that term is defined
in section 573.010;
[(2)] (4) "Public access computer", a computer or
other electronic device that is:
(a) Located in an elementary or secondary public
school, charter school, or public library;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1280 2
(b) Frequently or regularly used directly by a minor;
and
(c) Connected to any [computer] electronic
communication system.
182.826. 1. A public elementary or secondary school,
including a public charter school, shall provide parents and
guardians of students access to any digital library catalog
provided to students.
2. Each school district and charter school providing
students access to a digital library catalog shall appoint
an administrator of the digital library catalog whose duties
shall include excluding from the digital library catalog any
resource or material that is explicit sexual material or
pornographic for minors. The identity and workplace
location of the administrator of a digital library catalog
shall be made available upon request.
3. Each school district and charter school shall adopt
a resources challenge policy that:
(1) Is easily accessible to the public, and notice of
which is provided to parents of students, along with access
to the digital library catalog, and at least once per school
year, as part of a curriculum notice;
(2) Allows any taxpayer in the district to dispute or
challenge any resource or material provided or recommended
by any school employee, including materials present in the
school library or digital library catalog, as explicit
sexual material or pornographic for minors; and
(3) Requires the school district or charter school to
maintain a list disclosing to the public, and permanently
publish on the district's or school's website, the results
of all such disputes or challenges.

SB 1280 3
4. Any parent or guardian of a student may bring a
civil action against any school district or charter school,
as well as any school board member, charter school governing
body member, or other school district, public school, or
charter school officer or employee, including library
personnel and administrators of digital library catalogs,
for intentionally or negligently making available to his or
her student explicit sexual material or materials that are
pornographic for minors. Such action shall be brought in
the county where the violation occurred. If the parent or
guardian prevails in establishing negligence by a
preponderance of the evidence, the court shall award to the
parent five hundred dollars per violation plus court costs
and reasonable attorney's fees. If the parent or guardian
prevails in establishing an intentional violation by a
preponderance of the evidence, the court shall award to the
parent two thousand dollars per violation plus court costs
and reasonable attorney's fees.
182.827. 1. A public school or public charter school
that provides a public access computer or a digital library
catalog shall do one or both of the following:
(1) Equip [the] every computer or digital library
catalog with software that will [limit] restrict minors'
ability to gain access to material that is pornographic for
minors or explicit sexual materials, or purchase internet
connectivity from an internet service provider that provides
filter services to [limit] restrict access to material that
is pornographic for minors or explicit sexual material;
(2) Develop and implement by January 1, [2003] 2027, a
policy that is consistent with community standards and
establishes measures to restrict minors from gaining
computer access or digital library catalog access to

SB 1280 4
material that is pornographic for minors or explicit sexual
material.
2. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall establish rules and regulations for the
enforcement of subsection 1 of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2002, shall be invalid and void.
3. A public library that provides a public access
computer or digital library catalog shall do one or both of
the following:
(1) Equip [the] every computer or digital library
catalog with software that will [limit] restrict minors'
ability to gain access to material that is pornographic for
minors or explicit sexual material, or purchase internet
connectivity from an internet service provider that provides
filter services to [limit] restrict access to material that
is pornographic for minors or explicit sexual material;
(2) Develop and implement by January 1, [2003] 2027, a
policy that is consistent with community standards and
establishes measures to restrict minors from gaining
computer access or digital library catalog access to
material that is pornographic for minors or explicit sexual
material.

SB 1280 5
4. The secretary of state shall establish rules and
regulations for the enforcement of subsection 3 of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and
any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2002, shall be
invalid and void.
5. Any public school board member, charter school
governing body member, or other public school, school
district, or charter school officer or employee, including
library personnel, who willfully neglects or refuses to
perform a duty imposed by this section shall be subject to
the penalties imposed pursuant to section 162.091.
6. [A public school or public school board member,
officer or employee, including library personnel, public
library or public library board member, officer, employee or
trustee that complies with subsection 1 or 3 of this section
or an internet service provider providing internet
connectivity to such public school or library in order to
comply with this section shall not be criminally liable or
liable for any damages that might arise from a minor gaining
access to material that is pornographic for minors through
the use of a public access computer that is owned or
controlled by the public school or public library] Any
parent of a student may bring a civil action, including an

SB 1280 6
action for injunctive relief or for damages, against any
school board member, charter school governing body member,
or other school district, public school, or charter school
officer or employee, including library personnel, for any
violation of this section that occurs as a result of gross
negligence or intentional or willful and wanton misconduct
by such school board member, officer, or employee, including
library personnel. Such action shall be brought in the
county where the violation occurred. If the parent
prevails, the court shall award to such parent court costs
and reasonable attorney's fees and any other damages or
remedy which in the judgment of the court shall be
appropriate.
✓